playground/biafirand/biafirand.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl BI+ @U.PRFX.BI@ @D.PRFX.BI@ @C.PRFX.BI@


LEXICON Root
Verb ;

LEXICON Verb
afir   VPastNoAnd;
ajot   VPast;

LEXICON VPastNoAnd
and	VPastAnd;

LEXICON VPastAnd
+V+Past:0  #;

LEXICON VPast
+V+Past:0  #;
